Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-567
Intergovernmental Data Services Program Revolving Fund; created; use; investment.

The Intergovernmental Data Services Program Revolving Fund is created. The fund shall be administered by the division. The fund shall consist of fees paid for services provided to state agencies, political subdivisions, or other governmental or private entities by the division and shall be used to pay for expenses incurred by the division. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1994, LB 1194, § 3;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 121;

Laws 2000, LB 654, § 35;

R.S.Supp.,2000, § 81-1120.40;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 337.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.